Colorado, session 2026A, HB1241.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-121, add
(1)(g) as follows:
10-16-121. Required contract provisions in contracts between
carriers and providers - definitions.
(1) A contract between a carrier and a provider or its
representative concerning the delivery, provision, payment, or offering of
care or services covered by a managed care plan must make provisions
for the following requirements:
(g) (I) A PROVISION THAT REQUIRES THE CARRIER TO PROVIDE
NOTICE TO THE PROVIDER IF THE CARRIER MAKES A MATERIAL CHANGE TO
THE CONTRACT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-37-104.
(II) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(g), "MATERIAL CHANGE"
HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 25-37-102 (9).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-37-104, amend
(1) as follows:
25-37-104. Material change in health-care contract - written
advance notice.
(1) A material change to a contract shall occur IS AUTHORIZED
only if the person or entity provides NOTICE OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE in
writing, BY STANDARD ELECTRONIC MEANS, to the health-care provider the
proposed change and gives TWO SEPARATE TIMES AND, IF THE
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER HAS NOT AFFIRMATIVELY RESPONDED, A THIRD
TIME BY REGISTERED MAIL OR PERSONAL SERVICE TO THE HEALTH-CARE
-2- 1241

PROVIDER OR THE HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER'S ADMINISTRATOR WHO WAS
THE INDIVIDUAL WHO SIGNED THE CONTRACT AT LEAST ninety days notice
before the effective date of the change. The writing shall WRITTEN NOTICE
MUST be conspicuously entitled "notice of material change to contract"
AND MUST CLEARLY SET FORTH THE PROPOSED MATERIAL CHANGE. THE
PERSON OR ENTITY PROVIDING NOTICE MAY CHARGE THE ACTUAL COST
INCURRED FOR THE REGISTERED MAIL OR PERSONAL SERVICE TO THE
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2027, except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general
assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November
2026 and, in such case, will take effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of
the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor, whichever is
later.
(2) This act applies to contracts entered into or renewed on or
after the applicable effective date of this act.
-3- 1241